lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių sauga > Kūdikių saugos spynos ir apsaugos: Spintų spynos; Kampų apsaugos; Durų spynos; Stalčių spynos; Išleidimo angų dangteliai
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > An toàn cho bé > Khóa và thiết bị bảo vệ an toàn cho trẻ em: Khóa tủ; Miếng bọc góc; Khóa cửa ra vào; Khóa ngăn kéo; Nắp đậy ổ cắm
sv: Baby och småbarn > Babysäkerhet > Barnsäkerhetslås och skydd: Skåplås; Hörnskydd; Dörrlås; Lådlås; Uttagsskydd
pt-BR: Infantil > Segurança de bebês > Travas e dispositivos de segurança para bebês: Fechaduras de gabinete; Proteções de canto; Fechaduras de porta; Fechaduras de gaveta; Tampas de tomada
ru: Товары для детей > Безопасность детей > Замки-блокираторы и защитные накладки: Блокираторы для шкафов; Накладки на углы; Блокираторы для дверей; Блокираторы для ящиков; Заглушки для розеток
ko: 영유아 > 영유아 안전용품 > 영유아용 안전 잠금장치/가드: 캐비닛 잠금장치; 모서리 가드; 도어 잠금장치; 서랍 잠금장치; 콘센트 커버
cs: Děti a kojenci > Potřeby pro bezpečnost dětí > Dětské pojistky: Skříňové zámky; Ochrana rohů; Dveřní zámky; Zásuvkové zámky; Zásuvkové kryty
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก > ล็อกและที่กั้นเพื่อความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก: ล็อกแบบตู้; ขอบกันมุม; ล็อกแบบประตู; ล็อกแบบลิ้นชัก; ฝาครอบเต้ารับ
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires de sécurité pour bébés > Verrous et accessoires de sécurité pour bébés: Serrures d’armoire; Protections d’angle; Serrures de porte; Serrures de tiroir; Cache-prises
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Protección para el bebé > Protectores y cierres de seguridad: Cerraduras de armario; Protectores de esquinas; Cerraduras de puertas; Cerraduras de cajón; Tapas de salida
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Bezpieczeństwo niemowląt > Blokady i zabezpieczenia przed dziećmi: Blokady szafek; Osłony narożników; Zamki do drzwi; Blokady szuflad; Zabezpieczenia gniazdek
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Βρεφική ασφάλεια > Κλειδαριές και προστατευτικά ασφαλείας για βρέφη: Κλειδαριές ντουλαπιών; Προστατευτικά γωνιών; Κλειδαριές πόρτας; Κλειδαριές συρταριών; Καλύμματα πριζών
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿安全用品 > 婴儿安全锁与护栏: 柜锁; 防撞角; 门锁; 抽屉锁; 插座盖板
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用安全グッズ > ベビーガード・チャイルドロック: キャビネットロック; コーナーガード; ドアロック; 引き出しロック; コンセントカバー
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Varnost dojenčka > Varnostne ključavnice in varovala za dojenčke: Ključavnice za omarice; Zaščita za vogale; Ključavnice za vrata; Ključavnice za predale; Zaščitni pokrovčki za vtičnice
nl: Baby en peuter > Babyveiligheid > Veiligheidssloten voor baby's: Kastsloten; Hoekbeschermers; Deursloten; Ladesloten; Stopcontactafdekkingen
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Safety > Baby Safety Locks & Guards: Cabinet Locks; Corner Guards; Door Locks; Drawer Locks; Outlet Covers
da: Baby og småbørn > Baby – sikkerhedsudstyr > Børnesikring: Skabslåse; Hjørnebeskyttere; Dørlåse; Skuffelåse; Covers til stikkontakter
it: Bebè e bimbi > Sicurezza dei bebè > Blocchi di sicurezza per bambini: Serrature per armadietti; Protezione per angoli; Serrature per porte; Serrature per cassetti; Coperture prese
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Bababiztonság > Bababiztonsági zárak és védők: Szekrényzárak; Sarokvédők; Ajtózárak; Fiókzárak; Konnektorburkolatok
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Segurança do bebé > Bloqueios e proteções para segurança do bebé: Fechaduras de armários; Proteções de cantos; Fechaduras de portas; Fechaduras de gavetas; Coberturas de tomadas
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Siguranța bebelușului > Încuietori și dispozitive de protecție pentru copii: Încuietori pentru dulapuri; Protecții pentru colțuri; Încuietori pentru uși; Încuietori pentru sertare; Capace pentru prize
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan turvallisuus > Vauvan turvalukot ja suojaus: Kaapin lukot; Kulmasuojat; Ovilukot; Vetolaatikon lukot; Pistorasian suojat
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒安全 > 嬰兒安全鎖/護具: 櫥櫃鎖; 角落保護罩; 門鎖; 抽屜鎖; 插座護蓋
sk-SK: Bábätká > Bezpečnosť detí > Detské bezpečnostné zámky a chrániče: Zámky na skrinky; Rohové chrániče; Zámky dverí; Zámky zásuviek; Kryty zásuvky
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Güvenliği > Bebek Emniyet Kilitleri ve Muhafazaları: Dolap Kilitleri; Köşe Korumaları; Kapı kilitleri; Çekmece Kilitleri; Priz Kapakları
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babysicherheit > Babysicherungen & Schutzvorrichtungen: Schranksicherungen; Eckenschützer; Türsicherungen; Schubladensicherungen; Steckdosensicherungen
nb: Baby og barn > Babysikkerhet > Sikkerhetslåser for baby: Skaplåser; Hjørnebeskyttere; Dørlåser; Skuffelåser; Stikkontaktlåser
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Sigurnost bebe > Sigurnosne brave i zaštite za bebe: Brave za ormariće; Kutni odbojnik; Brave za vrata; Brave za ladice; Poklopci za utičnice
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Безопасност на бебето > Бебешки ключалки и предпазители: Предпазители за шкафове; Прдпазители за ъгли; Предпазни ключалки за врати; Предпазители за чекмеджета; Предпазители за контакт